Hawaii statutes.
[§386A-7] Liability and rights of parties
and third persons. (a) Neither the State nor any policyholder nor any
director or employee of the fund shall be liable to make any payments to the
fund or pay any expenses of the fund, except as provided under this chapter.

No policyholder shall have any right to the
return of any money paid to the fund, except as determined by the directors or
by law.

(b) The board may refund premiums to
policyholders; provided that such refunds do not jeopardize the fund's actuarial
responsibility. [L 1985, c 296, pt of §11]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next